Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 24

Athletic Trainers

63-24-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Athletic injury” means any injury sustained by a person as a result of such person's participation in exercises, sports, games, or recreation requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina, or comparable athletic injury that prevents such person from participating in such activities;

“Athletic trainer” means a person with specific qualifications as set forth in this chapter, who, upon the advice, consent and oral or written prescriptions or referrals of a physician licensed under this title, carries out the practice of prevention, recognition, evaluation, management, disposition, treatment, or rehabilitation of athletic injuries, and, in carrying out these functions the athletic trainer is authorized to use physical modalities, such as heat, light, sound, cold, electricity, or mechanical devices related to prevention, recognition, evaluation, management, disposition, rehabilitation, and treatment; an athletic trainer shall practice only in those areas in which such athletic trainer is competent by reason of training or experience that can be substantiated by records or other evidence found acceptable by the board in the exercise of the board's considered discretion; and

“Board” means the board of athletic trainers.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-6-301; Acts 1993, ch. 361, § 1; 2000, ch. 694, § 1; 2006, ch. 872, § 1.

Cross-References. State board of medical examiners, title 63, ch. 6, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

63-24-102. Board — Establishment and appointment — Terms — Officers — Meetings — Reimbursement.

There is established the board of athletic trainers to consist of five (5) members. Of the five (5) members:

Three (3) members shall be athletic trainers licensed in the state;

One (1) member shall be a physician licensed in the state; and

One (1) member shall be a representative of the public who is not an athletic trainer and is not commercially or professionally associated with the health care industry.

Members of the board shall be appointed by the governor. The Tennessee Athletic Trainers Society and the Tennessee Medical Association may each supply a list to the governor of at least three (3) nominees for each appointment or vacancy on the board in their respective categories. The governor may make an appointment from the lists.

Each licensed athletic trainer appointed to serve on the board shall:

Reside in the state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding appointment and at all times thereafter;

Be currently licensed in good standing as a licensed athletic trainer in this state;

Be currently engaged in the practice of athletic training as a licensed athletic trainer; and

Have been licensed as an athletic trainer in the state for no fewer than five (5) years.

Each physician appointed to serve on the board shall:

Reside in the state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding appointment and at all times thereafter;

Be currently licensed in good standing in the state; and

Have been licensed as a physician in the state for no fewer than five (5) years.

The representative of the public appointed to serve on the board shall:

Reside in the state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding appointment and at all times thereafter;

Have no direct or indirect financial interest in health care services;

Have never been, or while serving on the board be, an athletic trainer or enrolled in any health care educational program; and

Not be a member or employee of any board of control of any public or private health care group or organization.

Members of the board shall serve one (1) four-year term and may be reappointed. Any board member may be removed by the governor after notice and a hearing for incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office or moral turpitude. Vacancies on the board created by the expiration of a term of office or for any other reason shall be filled by the governor in the same manner as the original appointment. Appointed members shall serve until their replacement has been appointed and has agreed to serve. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the board:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6 who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the board shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board, prior to serving as a member of the board. This subdivision (c)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the board shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6 for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board during such person's period of service as a member of the board. This subdivision (c)(1)(B) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the board on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the board shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the board ends. This subdivision (c)(1)(C) shall apply to persons serving on the board as of July 1, 2010, and to persons appointed to the board subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (c) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (c). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

The chair and vice chair of the board shall be chosen from one (1) of the three (3) athletic trainer members and elected by the board. The chair shall preside over all meetings and business of the board. The vice chair shall preside over the meetings and business of the board in the absence of the chair and shall be responsible for signing the approved minutes of the board. The length of the terms of the elected officers shall be determined by rules duly promulgated by the board.

The board, for administrative purposes, shall meet at least annually and at such other times as necessary to conduct the business of the board at the call of the chair. For purposes of conducting board business, a majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The members of the board shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day's service in attending meetings of the board, and other official business of the board, and necessary expenses for traveling and subsistence while attending meetings. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall receive its administrative, legal and investigative support from the division of health related boards.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-6-302; Acts 1985, ch. 280, § 1; 2000, ch. 694, § 1; 2006, ch. 872, § 2; 2010, ch. 998, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The board of athletic trainers, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

63-24-103. Licensure requirement.

No person shall represent themselves or claim to be an athletic trainer or perform, for compensation, any of the activities of an athletic trainer as defined in this chapter without first obtaining a license under this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any person from serving as a student-trainer, or any similar position if such service is not primarily for compensation and is carried out under the supervision of an athletic trainer duly licensed as defined in this chapter and a physician licensed under this title. Such supervision will be provided under the guidelines of the National Athletic Trainers' Association (NATA) Board of Certification, Inc. and/or approved by the board.

Persons who are certified by the board as athletic trainers on May 9, 2000, may practice as licensed athletic trainers, provided such persons meet all of the other requirements of this chapter.

Upon the expiration of an athletic trainer's certificate, the board shall issue a license to replace such certificate, provided the athletic trainer has met all of the other requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, §§ 4, 10; T.C.A., §§ 63-6-303, 63-24-109; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2000, ch. 694, § 1.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-24-104. Qualifications of applicants — Reciprocity.

An applicant for an athletic trainer license must possess the following qualifications:

Have met the athletic training curriculum requirements of a college or university approved by the board and give proof of graduation; and

Satisfactorily completed all of the National Athletic Trainers' Association (NATA) Board of Certification, Inc. qualifications and be certified as an athletic trainer in good standing by the NATA Board of Certification, Inc., and/or approved by the board.

An out-of-state applicant must possess the stated qualifications of subsection (a). Upon receipt of the initial athletic trainer licensure fee, the board may grant, without examination, a license to any qualified nonresident athletic trainer who holds a valid license or certificate issued by another state and whose qualifications are deemed by the board to be at least equivalent to those required for licensure in this state; provided, that such other state extends the same privilege to qualified athletic trainers who are residents of this state. An out-of-state applicant from a state not having a licensure or certification act will be eligible to take the jurisprudence examination if certified by the NATA Board of Certification, Inc., and approved by the board.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-6-304; Acts 1985, ch. 280, § 2; 1993, ch. 361, §§ 2, 3; 2000, ch. 694, § 1.

63-24-105. Licensure — Renewal — Retirement.

An applicant for an athletic trainer license must submit an application to the board on forms prescribed by the board and submit the examination fee required by this chapter.

The applicant is entitled to an athletic trainer's license if the applicant possesses the qualifications enumerated in § 63-24-104; completes and passes the certification requirements and examination of the National Athletic Trainers' Association Board of Certification, Inc. or its equivalent as determined by the board; completes the jurisprudence examination administered and/or selected by the board, to its satisfaction; pays the licensure fee as set in § 63-24-106; and has not committed an act that constitutes grounds for denial of a license under § 63-24-107.

Any person who is issued initial licensure as an athletic trainer is deemed to be registered as such for two (2) years, or to the next even-numbered year immediately following conclusion of the initial two (2) calendar years. Thereafter, such person shall biennially apply to the board for certificate renewal and shall submit such information as may be requested by the board. Upon making an application for renewal, such person shall pay a renewal fee as prescribed pursuant to § 63-24-106.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter, who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state, shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person files with the board, an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board deems necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration, with the board as provided by this chapter, and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division of health related boards, with the approval of the commissioner of health, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months, and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢). No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (d).

Any person who possesses a certificate or temporary certificate issued by the board shall be deemed to possess a license or temporary license, respectively. At the time of renewal, a certificate holder who is approved for renewal shall receive a license from the board rather than a renewal of the certificate.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-6-305; Acts 1985, ch. 280, §§ 3, 6; 1986, ch. 675, § 13; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 63, 64; 1993, ch. 361, § 4; 2000, ch. 694, § 1.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-24-106. Fees.

The board shall, by duly promulgated rules, establish the following fees:

Athletic trainer application-examination fee;

Initial athletic trainer licensure fee;

Biennial licensure renewal fee;

Late renewal fee;

Licensure restoration fee; and

Fee for obtaining a duplicate of licensure.

The board is hereby authorized, by duly promulgated rules, to specify the conditions and circumstances, if any, under which one (1) or more of the fees in subsection (a) may be refunded in whole or in part.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-6-306; Acts 1985, ch. 280, § 4; 1989, ch. 523, § 48; 2000, ch. 694, § 1.

Cross-References. License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-24-107. Denial, suspension or revocation of licensure.

The board has the power and duty to:

Deny, restrict or condition a license to any applicant who applies for the license through reciprocity or otherwise;

Permanently or temporarily withhold issuance of a license;

Suspend, limit or restrict a previously issued license for such time and in such manner as the board may determine;

Reprimand, suspend, revoke or take such other disciplinary action in relation to an applicant or license holder as the board in its discretion may deem proper; or

Permanently revoke a license.

The grounds upon which the board shall exercise such power include, but are not limited to, circumstances in which the person has:

Violated standards of practice as determined by the board;

Practiced athletic training for compensation without holding an active license under this chapter;

Used or attempted to use an athletic trainer license that has been suspended or revoked;

Obtained or attempted to obtain an athletic trainer license by misleading statements, fraud or deceit or knowing misrepresentation;

Used the title “athletic trainer” without being licensed under this chapter;

Violated or conspired to violate this chapter, or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter; or

Been convicted of a felony for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the person's fitness to practice competently, as determined by the board.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-6-307; Acts 2000, ch. 694, § 1; 2006, ch. 872, § 4; 2016, ch. 719, § 6; 2018, ch. 745, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which added (b)(7), took effect on April 6, 2016, and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-24-108. Hearings — Procedure — Reissuance of licenses.

Any person whose application is denied is entitled to a hearing before the board if the person submits a written request to the board. Disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

On application, the board may reissue a license to a person whose license has been cancelled or revoked, but the application may not be made prior to the expiration of a period of six (6) months after the order of cancellation or revocation has become final, and application shall be made in the manner and form as the board may require.

Any person who practices in this state without having first complied with this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor for each instance of such practice. Each day any person practices without first obtaining a valid license or renewing a license constitutes a separate offense.

The board, in addition to the powers and duties expressed in this chapter with respect to the grant, denial and discipline of licensure is empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction of any person within this state who is practicing without a license or to whom a license has been denied, or whose license has been suspended or revoked by action of the board, to enjoin the person from continuing to practice within this state. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine all such causes as equity causes and exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings. Nothing in this section shall be construed as conferring criminal jurisdiction upon any court not now possessing such criminal jurisdiction, nor shall any such court, as an incident to the injunctive proceedings authorized in this subdivision (c)(2), have the power to assess the criminal penalties.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-6-308; Acts 2000, ch. 694, § 1; 2006, ch. 872, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-24-109. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-24-109 was transferred to § 63-24-103(c) in 1990.

63-24-110. Exemptions.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed so as to limit or prevent any person duly licensed or certified under the laws of this state from practicing the profession for which the person was licensed or certified.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply to any person engaging in the practice of athletic training while employed for such purpose by a non-Tennessee post secondary educational institution or professional athletic organization that is temporarily present in this state for an athletic competition or exhibition.

The board shall have the authority to assess civil penalties commensurate with those assessable under § 63-1-134 against persons who have knowingly employed, contracted for or otherwise utilized unlicensed persons in the practice of athletic training, with or without compensation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as applying to physicians duly licensed under this title who employ or contract for services provided by persons in the physician's office assisting in the care of patients and rendered under the supervision, control and responsibility of the licensed physician.

Acts 1983, ch. 361, §§ 12, 13; T.C.A., § 63-6-310; Acts 1985, ch. 280, § 5; 2000, ch. 694, § 1; 2006, ch. 872, § 6.

63-24-111. Powers and duties of board — Budget.

The board has the power and duty to:

Promulgate all rules that are reasonably necessary for the performance of its duties, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

License athletic trainers in compliance with this chapter;

Prescribe application forms for licensure and conduct, or select a licensure examination and establish the prerequisites, if any, for admission to the examination. The board is authorized to enter into a contract or agreement with an examination service and/or select an intermediary between the board and the examination service to process applicants for the examination;

Establish fees, in addition to those enumerated in § 63-24-106, that are necessary for the operation of the board, in accordance with § 9-4-5117;

Establish guidelines and standards for athletic trainers in the state that are not inconsistent with the other provisions of this chapter, and the grounds upon which disciplinary action may be taken, in addition to those causes enumerated in § 63-24-107;

Establish all requirements for mandatory continuing education as a condition of continued licensure, including a mechanism for waiver of the requirements in cases of undue hardship; and

Issue advisory private letter rulings to any affected licensed practitioner or license holder who makes a request regarding any matters within the board's primary jurisdiction. The private letter ruling shall only affect the person making the inquiry, and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case that might come before the board. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223, if the board chooses to do so.

The board shall pay all money received by it into the state treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration shall make such allotments out of the general fund that the commissioner may deem proper for the necessary and proper expenses of the board. No expenditure shall be made by the board, unless and until the allotment has been made by the commissioner. The allotment shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Acts 2006, ch. 872, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 872, § 7 provided that the rules currently governing the practice of athletic trainers to the extent they are consistent with the act shall remain in effect until such time as the board may promulgate their replacements. The duties of the board of medical examiners that are contained in the currently existing rules shall be assumed by the board of athletic trainers created by the act.